Hawaii, session 2025, SB414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation is the fee simple owner of the Villages of Laialii in Lahaina on the island of Maui.  The legislature further finds that since the 2023 Maui wildfire, three rental housing projects have been developed on the southern makai side of Leialii:  Kalaiola, Kilohana, and Kukuia.  Kalaiola consists of four hundred fifty units of temporary housing, Kilohana consists of one hundred sixty-nine units of temporary housing, and Kukuia consists of two hundred units of permanent housing.  The legislature anticipates that in the future, the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation will develop permanent housing on the Kilohana site, and the department of Hawaiian home lands will develop permanent housing on the Kalaiola site. The legislature also finds that the three projects are connected on their makai sides by a former cane haul road that runs from north to south on land owned by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation.  At its northern end, the former cane haul road connects to Laialii parkway and intersects with Waihikuli road and Fleming road as it heads south.  The legislature notes that before reaching Keawe street, the former cane haul road crosses lands owned by Keawe Street Investment LLC (TMK 4-5-011-011-0000) and West Maui Venture Group (por. of TMK 4-5-010-034-0000). Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to obtain the necessary portions of the former cane haul road to build a new access road from Keawe street to the Kilohana and Kalaiola sites. SECTION 2. To develop permanent housing on the Kilohana and Kalaiola sites, the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation shall institute proceedings for the condemnation of the necessary portions of the Keawe Street Investment, LLC, and West Maui Venture Group parcels, pursuant to chapter 101, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to build a new access road from Keawe street to the Kilohana and Kalaiola sites, complying with the requirements necessary to dedicate the road to the county of Maui. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to be deposited into the dwelling unit revolving fund. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the dwelling unit revolving fund the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for appraisals and other preparations to institute the condemnation proceedings pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________